North Carolina, session 2025, HB422.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-143.3A reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-143.3A. Waiver of 12-month residency requirement for certain veterans and other
individuals.
…
(b) Waiver of 12-Month Residency Requirement for Certain Individuals. – Any veteran,
dependent of a veteran, or other "covered" individual under 38 U.S.C. § 3679 ("The Choice Act")
who qualifies for admission to an institution of higher education as defined in
G.S. 116-143.1(a)(3) is eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate and applicable mandatory
fees for enrollment, to the extent required by 38 U.S.C. § 3679, enrollment without satisfying the
12-month residency requirement under G.S. 116-143.1, provided the individual meets all of the
following criteria:
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 academic year.
*H422-v-1*